Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB397.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 402. (a) A public employe shall have the right to examine the use of membership dues collected by the public employe's employe organization in the collective bargaining unit on a regular basis. An employe organization representing a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 collective bargaining unit shall file a quarterly report to the board within fifteen business days of the end of a calendar quarter which contains the information specified under subsection (b).(b) The report required in subsection (a) shall contain the following information:(1) The names of all officers and employes of the employe organization.(2) The annual salary and benefit costs of all officers and employes of the employe organization updated as of the date of the end of the calendar quarter, including any salary or benefit increase information that officers and employes received during the calendar quarter.(3) A detailed summary of all expenses incurred by the employe organization during the calendar quarter, including information on travel by officers or employes of the employe organization to conventions, conferences, meetings and other activities which required the expenditure of membership dues collected by the employe organization or other fees voluntarily paid by nonmembers in the collective bargaining unit.(4) Any independent expenditures as defined in section 1621(e) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the "Pennsylvania Election Code," made by the employe organization to influence elections, including the political cause or purpose being supported.Section 403. If applicable, the employe organization shall provide the board with the annual report required to be filed under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 11 (relating to labor-management reporting and disclosure procedure).Section 504. The board shall establish and maintain a 20250SB0397PN0344 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website with the reports filed under Article IV and copies of all collective bargaining agreements filed under section 905.Section 905. A public employer shall forward a copy of a collective bargaining agreement to the board within fifteen days of it being signed by both parties.Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0397PN0344 - 3 - 12345678